Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.240

Procedure on appeal—Notice of hearing.

Within three days after the filing of the transcript with the clerk of the superior court, the appellant shall give notice to the head of the legal department of the city or town and to its clerk that the transcript has been filed. The notice shall also state a time (not less than three days from the date of service thereof) when the appellant will call up the cause for hearing.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.44.240. Prior: 1957 c 143 s 6; prior: 1911 c 98 s 22, part; RRS s 9374, part.]